Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.782

Loss prevention review team—Appointment—Duties—Rules—Annual report.

(1) In consultation with the department and upon delegation, a state agency shall appoint a loss prevention review team when the death of a person, serious injury to a person, or other substantial loss is alleged or suspected to be caused at least in part by the actions of a state agency except when the death, injury, or substantial loss is already being investigated by another federal or state agency, or by the affected state agency, pursuant to the federal or state agency requirements. Any review conducted by another agency or under other requirements must contain elements of subsection (3) of this section and must comply with RCW 43.19.783 to the extent RCW 43.19.783 does not conflict with statutes or rules governing those reviews. The department may also direct a state agency to conduct a loss prevention review after consultation with the affected agency as to the purpose, scope, necessary resources, and intended outcomes of the loss prevention review. The department may provide guidance to the state agency conducting the loss prevention review as requested by the state agency.

(2) A loss prevention review team shall consist of at least three persons, and may include independent consultants, contractors, or state employees, but it shall not include any person directly involved in the loss or risk of loss giving rise to the review, nor any person with testimonial knowledge of the incident to be reviewed. At least one member of the review team shall have expertise relevant to the matter under review, but no more than half of the review team members may be employees of the affected agency.

(3) The loss prevention review team shall review the death, serious injury, or other incident and the circumstances surrounding it, evaluate its causes, and recommend steps to reduce the risk of such incidents occurring in the future. The loss prevention review team shall accomplish these tasks by reviewing relevant documents and interviewing persons with relevant knowledge. The loss prevention review team must submit a report in writing to the director and the head of the state agency involved in the loss or risk of loss. The report must include the teams' findings, analyze the causes and contributing factors, analyze future risk, include methods that the agency will use to address and mitigate the risks identified, which may include changes to policies or procedures, and any legislative recommendation necessary to address and carry out the risk treatment strategies identified in the subject report and include the manner in which the agency will measure the effectiveness of its changes. The final report shall not disclose the contents of any documents required by law or regulation to be kept private or confidential, or that are subject to legal privilege or exemption.

(4) The director may develop and enact rules to implement the provisions of this chapter that apply to all state agency loss prevention review teams. State agencies must notify the department immediately upon becoming aware of a death, serious injury, or other substantial loss that is alleged or suspected to be caused at least in part by the actions of the state agency.

(5) All state agencies shall provide the loss prevention review team ready access to relevant documents in their possession and ready access to their employees.

(6) The director shall submit an annual report to the legislature identifying the reviews conducted in the past year, providing appropriate metrics on effectiveness and efficiency of the loss prevention review team and programs, and summarizing any determinations of trends in incidents such as reductions or increases in the frequency or magnitude of losses and innovative approaches to mitigating risks identified.

[ 2017 c 318 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 508; 2002 c 333 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.41.370.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—2002 c 333: "The legislature intends that when the death of a person, serious injury to a person, or other substantial loss is alleged or suspected to be caused at least in part by the actions of a state agency, a loss prevention review shall be conducted. The legislature recognizes the tension inherent in a loss prevention review and the need to balance the prevention of harm to the public with state agencies' accountability to the public. The legislature intends to minimize this tension and to foster open and frank discussions by granting members of the loss prevention review teams protection from having to testify, and by declaring a general rule that the work product of these teams is inadmissible in civil actions or administrative proceedings." [ 2002 c 333 s 1.]